Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 5. Preferences.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions applicable to procurements using state money of forest, agricultural, and fisheries products, see AS 36.15.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska product preference, see 3 AAC 92.

Sec. 36.30.321.
Alaska bidder and related preferences.

If the bidder or offeror is an Alaska bidder, a five percent preference shall be applied to the price in the bid or proposal.

Except as otherwise provided in (d), (e), or (g) of this section, if a bidder or offeror qualifies as an Alaska bidder and is offering services through an employment program, a 15 percent preference shall be applied to the price in the bid or proposal.

If a bidder or offeror qualifies as an Alaska bidder and is an Alaska domestic insurer, and if the procurement is for an insurance-related contract, a five percent preference shall be applied to the price in the bid or proposal.

A 10 percent preference shall be applied to a price in a bid or proposal if the bidder or offeror qualifies as an Alaska bidder and is a

sole proprietorship owned by a person with a disability;

partnership under AS 32.06 or AS 32.11 if each of the partners is a person with a disability;

limited liability company organized under AS 10.50 if each of the members is a person with a disability;

corporation that is wholly owned by individuals, and each of the individuals is a person with a disability; or

joint venture that is composed of ventures that qualify under (1) — (4) of this subsection.

The division of vocational rehabilitation in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall add to its current list of qualified employment programs a list of individuals who qualify as persons with a disability under (d) of this section. To qualify for a preference under (d) of this section, a person must be on the list at the time the bid or proposal is opened.

If a bidder or offeror qualifies as an Alaska bidder and is a qualifying entity, a five percent preference shall be applied to the price in the bid or proposal. The preference may not exceed $5,000. In this subsection,

“Alaska veteran” means an individual who is both a resident of the state and a veteran;

“qualifying entity” means a

sole proprietorship owned by an Alaska veteran;

partnership under AS 32.06 or AS 32.11 if a majority of the partners are Alaska veterans;

limited liability company organized under AS 10.50 if a majority of the members are Alaska veterans; or

corporation that is wholly owned by individuals, and a majority of the individuals are Alaska veterans;

“veteran” means an individual who

served in the

armed forces of the United States, including a reserve unit of the United States armed forces; or

Alaska Territorial Guard, the Alaska Army National Guard, the Alaska Air National Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia; and

was separated from service under a condition that was not dishonorable.

A bidder or offeror may not receive a preference under both (b) and (d) of this section for the same contract.

Except as provided by (j) of this section, this section applies to all insurance contracts involving state money. In this subsection, “state money” has the meaning given in AS

36.30.990

, but also includes state grants and reimbursements to municipalities, school districts, and other entities.

To qualify for a preference under (b), (d), or (f) of this section, a bidder or offeror must add value by actually performing, controlling, managing, and supervising the services provided, or the bidder or offeror must have sold supplies of the general nature solicited to other state agencies, other governments, or the general public.

This section does not apply to solicitations or contracts for lease space under AS

36.30.080

, to procurements under AS

36.30.305

—

36.30.310

or, except as provided otherwise by regulation under AS

36.30.320

, to small procurements under AS

36.30.320

.

In this section, “person with a disability” means an individual who

has been determined to be permanently disabled by the

United States Social Security Administration under 42 U.S.C. 423 or 1381 — 1383f (Social Security Act);

teachers’ retirement system under AS 14.25, the judicial retirement system under AS 22.25, the public employees’ retirement system under AS 39.35, or the elected public officers’ retirement system under former AS 39.37;

Federal Civil Service Retirement System under 5 U.S.C. 2107, 3323, and 8331 — 8351;

federal employees’ retirement system under 5 U.S.C. 8401 — 8480; or

division of vocational rehabilitation in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development using disability standards under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383f (Social Security Act) for eligibility for certain state disability programs;

is receiving permanent total disability under AS 23.30 (Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act);

has been discharged from military service under honorable conditions and is certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as having incurred a 50 percent or greater disability during military service; or

has served in the Alaska Territorial Guard and incurred a 50 percent or greater disability while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 19 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.322.
Use of local forest products.

Only timber, lumber, and manufactured lumber products originating in this state from Alaska forests may be procured by an agency or used in construction projects of an agency unless

the manufacturers and suppliers who have notified the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development of their willingness to manufacture or supply Alaska forest products have been given reasonable notice of the forest product needs of the procurement or project; and

a manufacturer or supplier who has notified the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development of its willingness to manufacture or supply Alaska forest products is not the low bidder after all applicable preferences have been applied to the price of the qualifying forest product under AS

36.30.336

.

The provisions of AS

36.30.326

—

36.30.332

do not apply to procurements of timber, lumber, and manufactured lumber products or the use of those items in construction projects of an agency.

During the period of performance of a state contract, the contractor shall maintain records showing efforts made in using Alaska forest products or evidence of Alaska forest products not being available or reasonably competitive. The contractor shall provide the records to the procurement officer on a periodic basis, as required by regulations adopted by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 13, 14 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 20 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) and (c) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) and (c) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska product preference, see 3 AAC 92.

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of state and local laws requiring governmental units to give “purchase preference” to goods manufactured or services performed in state. 84 ALR4th 419.

Sec. 36.30.324.
Use of Alaska products and recycled Alaska products.

Alaska products shall be used whenever practicable in procurements for an agency. Recycled Alaska products shall be used when they are of comparable quality, of equivalent price, and appropriate for the intended use.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1988)

Sec. 36.30.326.
Contract specifications.

Contract specifications for a procurement for an agency must include a provision that a bidder or offeror that designates in a bid or proposal the use of Alaska products identified in the specifications will receive the preference granted under AS

36.30.328

in the evaluation of the bid or proposal if the designated Alaska products meet the contract specifications.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.328.
Grant of Alaska products preference.

In the evaluation of a bid or proposal for a procurement for an agency, a bid or offer that designates the use of Alaska products identified in the contract specifications and designated as Class I, Class II, or Class III state products under AS

36.30.332

is decreased by the percentage of the value of the designated Alaska products under AS

36.30.332

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.330.
Penalty for failing to use designated products.

If a successful bidder or offeror who designates the use of an Alaska product in a bid or proposal for a procurement for an agency fails to use the designated product for a reason within the control of the successful bidder or offeror, each payment under the contract shall be reduced according to the following schedule:

for a Class I designated Alaska product — four percent;

for a Class II designated Alaska product — six percent;

for a Class III designated Alaska product — eight percent.

A person is not a responsible bidder or offeror if, in the preceding three years, the person has twice designated the use of an Alaska product in a bid or proposal for a procurement for an agency and has each time failed to use the designated Alaska product for reasons within the control of the bidder or offeror.

The procurement officer shall report to the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development each contractor penalized under (a) of this section. The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall maintain a list of contractors determined not to be responsible bidders under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 36.30.331.
Delivery of supplies.

Supplies purchased under this chapter shall be delivered at a location within the state unless the department determines that a point of delivery outside the state would be in the best interest of the state. A bid or proposal involving the procurement of supplies must specify the delivery location and must state that the price is the delivered price at that location.

History.

(§ 27 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Sec. 36.30.332.
Classification of Alaska products.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall adopt regulations establishing the value added in the state for materials and supplies produced or manufactured in the state that are used in a state procurement and establishing whether a product qualifies as a recycled Alaska product. The commissioner shall publish a list of the products annually. A supplier may request inclusion of its product on the appropriate list.

Materials and supplies with value added in the state that are

more than 25 percent and less than 50 percent produced or manufactured in the state are Class I products;

50 percent or more and less than 75 percent produced or manufactured in the state are Class II products; and

75 percent or more produced or manufactured in the state are Class III products.

In a bid or proposal evaluation a

Class I product is given a three percent preference;

Class II product is given a five percent preference;

Class III product is given a seven percent preference.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 15 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska product preference, see 3 AAC 92.

Sec. 36.30.333.
Procurement of paper.

Except as otherwise required under AS

36.15.050

, AS

36.30.322

—

36.30.332

, and

36.30.334

—

36.30.338

, when a state agency purchases paper, at least 25 percent of the quantity purchased must be recycled paper unless recycled paper is not available for the purchase or unless, after application of the procurement preference under AS

36.30.337

, the recycled paper is more expensive than the nonrecycled paper.

History.

(§ 28 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “AS

36.30.337

” was substituted for “AS

36.30.339

” in this section to reflect the 1996 renumbering of AS

36.30.339

.

Sec. 36.30.334.
Identification of Alaska products.

An agency may identify specific Alaska products for use in making a procurement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.335.
Relationship to other product preferences. [Repealed, § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 36.30.336.
Application of preferences.

Except as provided in AS

36.15.050(g)

and AS

36.30.321

(g), the preferences provided in AS

36.15.050

and AS

36.30.321

—

36.30.338

are cumulative. A bidder who would otherwise qualify for preferences under AS 36.30.321 may not be given a preference over another bidder who qualifies for the same preferences.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, AS

36.30.321

—

36.30.338

apply to all procurements subject to this chapter, except as provided in AS

36.15.050(h)

and AS

36.30.322(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1987; am § 16 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 21 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska product preference, see 3 AAC 92.

Sec. 36.30.337.
Procurement preference for recycled products.

In the evaluation of a bid or proposal for an agency procurement of products, the agency shall decrease the bid or proposal by five percent if the bid or proposal indicates that the products being purchased will be recycled products.

A decrease made under (a) of this section is in addition to other preferences allowed for the procurement.

The department shall establish the minimum percentage of recycled content that will qualify a product as a recycled product under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 175 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

36.30.339

. Renumbered in 1996 under § 49,
ch. 137, SLA 1996.

Sec. 36.30.338.
Definitions.

In AS

36.30.322

—

36.30.338

,

“Alaska product” means a product of which not less than 25 percent of the value, as determined in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

36.30.332(a)

, has been added by manufacturing or production in the state;

“produced or manufactured” means processing, developing, or making an item into a new item with a distinct character and use through the application within the state of materials, labor, skill, or other services;

“product” means materials or supplies but does not include gravel and asphalt;

“recycled Alaska product” means an Alaska product of which not less than 50 percent of the value of the product consists of a product that was previously used in another product, if the recycling process is done in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 36.30.339.
[Renumbered as AS 36.30.337.]